California statutes. Vehicle Code
Prior to operation of a vehicle at a declared gross vehicle weight greater than reported to, and registered by, the department, the owner shall make application to the department and pay all appropriate fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 52.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

9407.

The fee required under Section 9400 and 9400.1 shall be reduced proportionately for each month which has elapsed since the expiration of the last issued registration certificate if either of the following applies:

(a) Application for registration is made after the first month of any registration year and a certification was filed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4604.

(b) Application for registration of a vehicle registered on a
 partial year basis is made after the first month following expiration and a certification was filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9706.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9408.

(a) Whenever any registered commercial vehicle, including, but not limited to, any commercial vehicle operating in California with apportioned registration, for which fees have been paid under Section 9400 or 9400.1 is withdrawn from service in this state before the expiration of the registration, the owner may surrender the registration card and license plates previously issued for the vehicle to the department and, within 90 days of the time of withdrawal, make application for the registration of another commercial vehicle which is subject
 to the fees specified in Section 9400 or 9400.1. If the vehicle that is withdrawn from service is operating in this state under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050 of Chapter 4, credit for any unused fees paid under Section 9400 or 9400.1 may be applied only to a commercial vehicle concurrently added to the same apportioned fleet.

(b) Under the circumstances described in subdivision (a), and upon a proper showing of the facts, the department upon determining the fees payable under this division shall allow as credit thereon the unexpired portion, as of the month of the application, of the fee paid under Section 9400 or 9400.1 for the previous registration, but, in addition to fees otherwise payable under this division less any credit, shall charge and collect an additional fee of two dollars ($2) for issuance of the new registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9409.

Any forklift truck which is designed primarily for loading and unloading and for stacking materials and is operated or drawn along a highway unladen is exempt from the provisions of Section 9400.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1395.)
-------------------------------------------

9410.

(a) One commercial vehicle weighing less than 8,001 pounds unladen, which displays the distinguishing license plate designated in, and is registered to a person who qualifies for the exemption provided by, Section 22511.5, is exempt from the weight fees provided for in Section 9400.

(b) A commercial vehicle displaying a distinguishing placard pursuant to Section 22511.5 is not exempt from weight fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 404, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Payment of Fees [9550. - 9564.]

9550.

All fees required to be paid by a vehicle dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, remanufacturer, remanufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, representative, or transporter, in accordance with this code, for any license or special plates shall be paid at the time application is made to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

9551.

All fees required to be paid by an automobile dismantler, in accordance with this code, for any license, or special plates, shall be paid at the time application is made to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------

9551.2.

(a) When an application is made for a renewal or initial registration of a vehicle, the department shall apply the amount of any operative offset established by subdivision (a) of Section 10754 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The department shall alter its billing notice for vehicle license fees to indicate the amount of the vehicle license fee for each vehicle as calculated under Section 10752 or 10752.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or under Section 18115 of the Health and Safety Code, and the amount of the applicable offset as
 required by subdivision (a) of Section 10754 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The amount of the offset shall be identified on the billing notice as the “VLF Offset.” The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, as required by Section 11000 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, provide information to the Controller with respect to the amount of offsets subject to this subdivision.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1999, or on that earlier date that is determined by both the director of the department, and the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development, to be feasible for the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 104.   Effective August 20, 1998.   Section operative July 1, 1999, or sooner, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9552.

(a) Whenever any vehicle is operated upon any highway of this state without the fees first having been paid as required by this code, and those fees have not been paid within 20 days of its first operation, those fees are delinquent, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Fees are delinquent whenever application for renewal of registration, or any application for renewal of special license plates, is made after midnight of the expiration date of the registration or special
 plates, or 60 days after the date the registered owner is notified by the department pursuant to Section 1661, whichever is later.

(c) Whenever any person has received as transferee a properly endorsed certificate of ownership and the transfer fee has not been paid as required by this code within 10 days, the fee is delinquent.

(d) Whenever any person becomes an automobile dismantler, dealer, manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or transporter without first having paid the license and special plate fees as required by this code, the fees are delinquent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 13.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9553.

(a) A penalty shall be added upon any delinquent application as provided in Section 9552, except as provided in Section 4604 or 9706, or in subdivision (b).

(b) When renewal fee penalties have not accrued with respect to a vehicle and the vehicle is transferred, the transferee has 20 days from the date of the transfer to pay the registration fees which become due without payment of penalties or to file a certification pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4604 if the vehicle
 will not be operated, moved, or left standing upon any highway during the subsequent registration year, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) (1) A dealer or lessor-retailer submitting an application for registration or transfer of a used vehicle shall have 30 days from the date of sale to submit the fees, without the penalty that otherwise would be required under subdivision (a).

(2) This subdivision does not apply to penalties due or accrued prior to the date of sale by the dealer or lessor-retailer.

(d) A penalty shall be added if the fees specified in Section 9255 are not paid within 20 days after they become delinquent.

(e) In addition to the imposition of monetary fines or fees as specified in this section, delinquent
 registration may result in impoundment of the vehicle pursuant to Section 22651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 14.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9553.5.

(a) Whenever fees have not been paid in full for an application for registration of vehicles registered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4, the registrant shall have 20 days from the date of notice by the department to pay the balance of the fees due.

(b) Failure to pay the balance of the fees due within 20 days shall subject the application to penalties, as defined in Sections 9554 and 9554.5, on the unpaid portion of the California fees
 due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 20.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9553.7.

The penalty for delinquency with respect to any transfer is fifteen dollars ($15) and applies only to the last transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 21.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9554.

(a) (1) A penalty shall be added on any application for renewal of registration made later than midnight of the date of expiration or on or after the date penalties become due. Penalties shall be computed as provided in Section 9559 and shall be collected with the fee.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), commencing on July
 1, 2011, a penalty shall not be added if an application for renewal of registration, or an application for renewal of special license plates, is made within 30 days after midnight of the expiration date of the registration or special plates. This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2012.

(b) The penalty assessment for the delinquent payment of the registration fee specified in Section 9250 shall be as follows:

(1) Ten dollars ($10) for a delinquency period of 10 days or less.

(2) Fifteen dollars ($15) for a delinquency period of more than 10 days, to and including 30 days.

(3) Thirty dollars ($30) for a delinquency period of more than 30 days, to and including one year.

(4) Fifty dollars ($50) for a delinquency period of more than one year, to and including two years.

(5) One hundred dollars ($100) for a delinquency period of more than two years.

(c) The penalty assessment for the delinquent payment of the weight fee specified in Section 9400 or 9400.1 and the vehicle license fee as specified in Section 10751 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be as follows:

(1) Ten percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both fees, for a delinquency period of 10 days or less.

(2) Twenty percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both
 fees, for a delinquency period of more than 10 days, to and including 30 days.

(3) Sixty percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both fees, for a delinquency period of more than 30 days, to and including one year.

(4) Eighty percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both fees, for a delinquency period of more than one year, to and including two years.

(5) One hundred sixty percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both fees, for a delinquency period of more than two years.

(d) On
 or after January 1, 2003, a penalty assessment for weight fees not reported and not paid within 20 days as required by Section 9406 shall be applied to the difference in the weight fee as follows:

(1) Ten percent of the fee for a delinquency period of 10 days or less.

(2) Twenty percent of the fee for a delinquency period more than 10 days, to and including 30 days.

(3) Sixty percent of the fee for a delinquency period more than 30 days, to and including one year.

(4) Eighty percent of the fee for a delinquency period more than one year, to and including two years.

(5) One hundred sixty percent for a delinquency period more than two years.

(e) A single penalty assessment for the delinquent payment of the fees specified in Sections 9250.8 and 9250.13 shall be as follows:

(1) Ten dollars ($10) for a delinquency period of 10 days or less.

(2) Fifteen dollars ($15) for a delinquency period of more than 10 days, to and including 30 days.

(3) Thirty dollars ($30) for a delinquency period of more than 30 days, to and including one year.

(4) Fifty dollars ($50) for a delinquency period of more than one year, to and including two years.

(5) One hundred dollars ($100) for a delinquency period of more than two years.

(6) This subdivision applies to the renewal of registration for vehicles with expiration dates on or after December 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 21, Sec. 6.   (SB 94)   Effective May 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9554.1.

The amount of any penalty calculated pursuant to Section 9554 or subdivision (b) of Section 18116 of the Health and Safety Code shall be reduced by the amount of any offset implemented pursuant to Section 10754 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or any portion of the amount of that offset.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 105.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

9554.2.

Upon the operation of a commercial motor vehicle at a greater gross vehicle weight than had been reported to and registered by the department, a new registration application shall be made to the department. The greater declared gross vehicle weight fee as required in Section 9400.1 and any penalties defined in this code shall be paid to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 54.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

9554.5.

(a) On and after January 1, 2003, a penalty shall be added on any application for original registration made later than midnight of the date of expiration or on or after the date penalties become due. Penalties shall be computed as provided in Section 9559 and shall be collected with the fee.

(b) The penalty assessment for the delinquent payment of the registration fee specified in Section 9250 shall be as follows:

(1) Thirty dollars ($30) for a delinquency period of one year or less.

(2) Fifty dollars ($50) for a delinquency period of more than one year, to and including two years.

(3) One hundred dollars ($100) for a delinquency period of more than two years.

(c) The penalty assessment for the delinquent payment of the weight fee specified in Section 9400 or 9400.1 and the vehicle license fee as specified in Section 10751 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be as follows:

(1) Forty percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both fees, for a delinquency period of one year or less.

(2) Eighty percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both fees, for a delinquency period of more than one year, to and including two years.

(3) One hundred sixty percent of the vehicle license fee, or the combined amount of the vehicle license fee and the weight fee if the vehicle is subject to both fees, for a delinquency period of more than two years.

(d) A single penalty assessment for the delinquent payment of the fees specified in Sections 9250.8 and 9250.13 shall be as follows:

(1) Thirty dollars ($30) for a delinquency period of one year or less.

(2) Fifty dollars ($50) for a delinquency period
 of more than one year, to and including two years.

(3) One hundred dollars ($100) for a delinquency period of more than two years.

(4) This subdivision shall apply to applications for an original registration where the date the fee is due is on or after December 1, 2008.

(e) This section shall become operative January 1, 2009.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 24) and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 756, Sec. 25.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Section operative January 1, 2009, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9555.

Whenever any trailer coach is in this State without the registration fee having first been paid as required by this code, the fee is delinquent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9556.

Whenever any person or organization authorized by the department under Section 4610 receives an application for renewal of registration accompanied by the proper fee and endorses a receipt or validates a registration card or potential registration card in respect to the application for renewal of registration prior to midnight on the date registration expires in any year, the application and payment of fees shall not be deemed delinquent or subject to penalty, except that the person or organization so receiving the application and fees shall transmit the application and fees to the department as promptly as practicable in the immediate course of
 business.

This section shall become operative on March 8, 1976, unless a later enacted statute, which is chaptered before March 8, 1976, deletes or extends such date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1330, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

9557.

(a) No penalty shall be imposed for delinquent payment of any fee required to be paid under this code in the event any instrument for effective payment of such fee is placed in the United States mail or in any postal box maintained by the United States Postal Service with sufficient identification in an envelope with postage thereon prepaid and addressed to the Department of Motor Vehicles at Sacramento, or to one of the regularly established branch offices of the department or to any person or organization authorized by the department under Section 4610, prior to the date or time the fee becomes delinquent.

(b) Any person so mailing an instrument for payment of any fee may file with the department a certificate in writing showing compliance with the provisions of this section. The certificate shall be accepted by the department as prima facie evidence of such mailing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

9558.

If a check in payment of a fee or penalty is not paid by the bank on which it is drawn on its first presentation, the person tendering the check remains liable for the payment of the fee, or fee and penalty, as if he had not tendered the check. The department in its discretion may redeposit a check in payment of the fee, or the fee and penalty, not more than once without assessing additional penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

9559.

In computing any registration or weight fee or penalty imposed by this code, whether on a proration or otherwise, a fraction of a dollar is disregarded, unless it equals or exceeds fifty cents ($0.50), in which case it is treated as one full dollar ($1). Computation of any penalty shall be made from the fee after the same has been computed as provided in this section.

Any fee or penalty in an amount of forty-nine cents ($0.49) or less shall be deemed to be one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9559.5.

When, by reason of the assignment or reassignment of a renewal registration date by the director, the registration year is less than, or more than, 12 months, the fee due for that renewal shall be decreased or increased by one-twelfth of the annual fee for each month of the period less than, or in excess of, 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9560.

(a) The department shall waive all penalties that may be due for late payment of registration renewal fees on a vehicle for any period during which the registered owner is deployed to a location outside of the state.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, “deployed” means being ordered to temporary military duty during a period when a Presidential Executive order specifies that the United States is engaged in combat or homeland defense and the registered
 owner is one of the following:

(A) A member of the armed forces.

(B) A member of the armed forces reserve or the National Guard who has been called to active duty or active service.

(2) “Deployed” does not include either of the following:

(A) Temporary duty for the sole purpose of training or processing.

(B) A permanent change of station.

(c) This section does not apply to a registered owner who applies for registration renewal more than 60 days after termination of his or her deployment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9561.

(a) When a legal owner or his or her agent repossesses a vehicle on which renewal fees are due, the department shall waive any renewal penalties that are due for late payment if the fees are paid within 60 days of taking possession.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, when a repossessed vehicle is sold through a dealer conducting a wholesale motor vehicle auction as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4456 and Article 5 (commencing with Section 6100) of
 Chapter 2 of Division 3, any penalties that may be due are waived, if all renewal fees that are due are paid not later than 60 days after the date of sale at the auction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 180, Sec. 10.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9561.5.

The department shall waive any penalties that may be due for late payment of registration renewal fees on a vehicle if all of the following criteria are met:

(a) The vehicle is sold through a dealer conducting a wholesale motor vehicle auction as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4456 and Article 5 (commencing with Section 6100) of Chapter 2 of Division 3.

(b) Immediately prior to the sale the vehicle was registered as a leased
 vehicle.

(c) Delivery of the vehicle to the dealer conducting the wholesale motor vehicle auction was not later than 25 days after the termination of the lease.

(d) The date of termination of the lease and the date of delivery to the auction is reported on the application for registration, or application for transfer and registration, in a format that is acceptable to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

9562.

(a) When a transferee or purchaser of a vehicle applies for transfer of registration, as provided in Section 5902, and it is determined by the department that registration penalties accrued prior to the purchase of the vehicle, and that the transferee or purchaser was not cognizant of the nonpayment of the fees for registration for the current or prior registration years, the department may waive the registration penalties upon payment of the fees for registration due.

(b) Other
 provisions of this code notwithstanding, the director may, at his or her discretion, investigate into the circumstances of any application for registration to ascertain if penalties had accrued through no fault or intent of the owner. If the director determines that the circumstances justify it, he or she may waive any penalties upon payment of the fees for registration then due.

(c) When a transferee or purchaser of a vehicle applies for transfer of registration of a vehicle, and it is determined by the department that fees for registration of the vehicle for any year are unpaid and due, that the fees became due prior to the transfer or purchase of the vehicle by the transferee or purchaser and that the transferee or purchaser was not cognizant of the fact that the fees were unpaid and due, the department may waive the fees and any penalty thereon if the license plate assigned to the vehicle displays a validating device issued by the
 department and the validating device contains the year number of the registration year for which the transferee or purchaser is requesting a waiver of fees and penalties.

(d) Upon the transfer of a vehicle for which fees for registration and any penalties thereon are unpaid and due, the fees and penalties are, notwithstanding the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of this chapter, the personal debt of the transferor of the vehicle who did not pay the fees and penalties when they became due or accrued. The fees and penalties may be collected by the department in an appropriate civil action if the department has waived the fees and penalties pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9563.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, when a vehicle is rebuilt and restored to operation after it has been reported to be dismantled pursuant to Section 11520, the application shall be deemed to be an application for original registration of a new vehicle for determination of fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

9564.

(a) A scrap metal processor, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 221, who acquires a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, and who complies with all the provisions of this section, is not required to submit a certificate of nonoperation in lieu of fees or to pay fees that would otherwise be required if the vehicle were to be currently registered.

(b) A scrap metal processor who acquires a vehicle as provided in subdivision (a) shall
 submit either of the following to the department before reducing the vehicle to its component materials:

(1) Documentation that the vehicle was acquired pursuant to Section 22669 and disposed of in compliance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 22850) of Chapter 10 of Division 11.

(2) The properly endorsed certificate of title transferring title to the scrap iron processor and any available license plates or registration documents.

(c) A vehicle delivered to a scrap metal processor under subdivision (a) shall not be reconstructed or made operable, unless it is a vehicle which qualifies for either horseless carriage license plates or historical vehicle license plates pursuant to Section 5004, in which case the vehicle may be reconstructed or made operable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 316, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Partial Year Payment of Weight Fees [9700. - 9711.]

9700.

With respect to vehicles subject to additional registration fees under Section 9400 or 9400.1, a proportionate share of the additional fees may be paid for any partial period of one month or more, but less than 12 months, in an amount determined to be one-twelfth of the annual registration times the consecutive months, or fraction thereof, of the period of registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9702.

An additional fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be charged for each application for partial year registration, or renewal thereof, whenever a person pays the fee under Section 9400 or 9400.1, as provided in Section 9700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9704.

Every partial year vehicle registration and every certificate or insignia issued under this article shall expire at midnight on the last day of the period for which issued. The department may, upon payment of the proper fees, renew the registration of the vehicle for a period of months less than the remainder of the registration year or for the remainder of the registration year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 636, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

9706.

(a) Application for partial year registration in conjunction with an application for original California registration shall be made by the owner within 20 days of the date the vehicle first becomes subject to California registration. Any application for partial year registration submitted after that 20-day period shall be denied registration for a partial year, and the vehicle shall be subject to payment of the fees for the entire registration year. In addition to the fee for the registration year, a penalty, as specified in Section 9554, shall be added to the fee for registration.

(b) Any application to renew registration for a part of the remainder of the registration year or for the
 entire remainder of the registration year shall be made prior to midnight of the
 expiration date of the last issued registration certificate. Application shall be made upon presentation of the last issued registration card or of a potential registration issued by the department for use at the time of renewal and by payment of the required partial year fees, or, if renewal is for the remainder of the registration year, by payment of the annual fee required by Section 9400 or 9400.1, as reduced pursuant to Section 9407.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an owner who registers a vehicle pursuant to this article during a calendar year shall, if the vehicle was not operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway, file a certificate of nonoperation prior to the date of the first operation of the vehicle on the highways in a manner which requires that registration and shall, by December 31 of each calendar
 year thereafter, file a certification pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4604 when the vehicle is not registered for operation on the highways for the succeeding calendar year.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the owner of any vehicle being moved or operated for the purpose of providing support to firefighting operations while the vehicle or owner is under contract to the United States Forestry Service, the United States Department of the Interior, the Bureau of Land Management, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, or the Office of Emergency Services may obtain partial year registration if application is made within 20 days of the date the vehicle is first operated, moved, or left standing on the highway and the owner has obtained a letter of authorization from the department prior to the date that the vehicle is
 first operated, moved, or left standing on the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 524.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

9706.1.

If the registration card or potential registration card is unavailable, payment of the fee prescribed by Section 9265 for the issuance of a duplicate registration shall not be required in addition to the other fees prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 9706.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 22.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

9710.

When an application for renewal of registration of a vehicle has been made as required by Section 9706, the vehicle may be operated on the highways until the new certificate or insignia of current registration has been received from the department if there is displayed on the vehicle, in addition to the license plates or validating devices issued to the vehicle for the previous year, the certificate or insignia issued to the vehicle for the previous partial year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1352, Sec. 13.   Effective September 27, 1990.   Applicable from July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 21 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

9711.

This article does not apply to any owner or lessor of a commercial vehicle based in a foreign jurisdiction which does not grant reciprocity or proportionate registration to residents of this state while operating within that jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 907, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Enforcement of Liens [9800. - 9808.]

9800.

(a) Payments for any of the following, and any interest, penalties, or service fees added thereto, required to register or transfer the registration of a vehicle, constitute a lien on the vehicle on which they are due or which was involved in the offense, and on any other vehicle owned by the owner of that vehicle:

(1) Registration fees.

(2) Transfer fees.

(3) License fees.

(4) Use taxes.

(5) Penalties for offenses relating to the standing or parking of a vehicle for which a notice of parking violation has been served on the owner, and any administrative service fee added to the penalty.

(6) Any court-imposed fine or penalty assessment, and any administrative service fee added thereto, which is subject to collection by the department.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a person is cited for a foreign registered auxiliary dolly, semitrailer, or trailer having been operated without current year registration or valid California permits or registration, an amount equal to the minimum registration fees or transfer fees, and any penalty added thereto, from the date they became due, shall, by
 election of the power unit operator, constitute a lien upon the California registered power unit which was pulling the dolly, semitrailer, or trailer. However, this subdivision is not applicable if the citation is issued at a scale operated by the Department of the California Highway Patrol and registration for the vehicle can be issued there immediately upon payment of the fees due.

(c) Every lien arising under this section expires three years from the date the fee, tax, or parking penalty first became due unless the lien is perfected pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) A lien is perfected when a notice is mailed to the registered and legal owners at the addresses shown in the department’s records and the lien is recorded on the electronic vehicle registration records of the department. A perfected lien shall expire five years from the date of perfection.

(e) Employees and members of the Department of the California Highway Patrol assigned to commercial vehicle scale facilities may possess and sell trip permits approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1199, Sec. 10.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

9801.

(a) (1) When the payment required for the registration or transfer of a vehicle is delinquent pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 9800, the department may collect the amount of the lien on the vehicle plus costs, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), by the filing of a certificate requesting judgment pursuant to Section 9805, or by appropriate civil action and by the seizure and sale of the vehicle or any other vehicle owned by the owner of the unregistered vehicle.

(2) In the case of a leased vehicle, the authority provided in paragraph (1) to seize and sell the vehicle or any other vehicle owned by the owner of that vehicle shall not apply to a lien for any delinquency for which only the lessee is liable pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10879 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) At least 10 days before the seizure, notice of the lien and of the intent to seize and sell the vehicle shall be given by the department to the registered and legal owners, and to any other person known to be claiming an interest in the vehicle, by registered mail addressed to those persons at the last known addresses appearing on the records of the department.

(c) Any person receiving the notice of the lien and the intent to seize and sell the vehicle may request a hearing to contest
 the existence or amount of the lien. If no hearing is requested, the vehicle shall be seized and sold.

(d) If a hearing is requested, 10 days’ notice shall be given of the time and place of the hearing, which shall be held within the county of residence of the person requesting the hearing or of the registered owner. The hearing shall be conducted by a referee who shall submit findings and recommendations to the director or his or her authorized representative, who shall decide the matter. The decision shall be effective on notice thereof to the interested parties. However, the director or his or her authorized representative may rescind the decision and reconsider the matter for good cause shown at any time within three years after the date the disputed fee or tax first became due, or within one year from the hearing, whichever is later.

(e) At any time before seizure or sale,
 any registered owner, legal owner, or person claiming an interest in the vehicle may pay the department the amount of the lien, plus costs. In that event, the seizure or sale shall not be held and the vehicle, if seized, shall be returned by the department to the person entitled to its possession. This payment shall not constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(f) When the department or an authorized agent has reasonable cause to believe that the lien may be jeopardized within the 10-day notice-of-intent period, the vehicle may be seized without prior notice to the registered or legal owner, upon obtaining authorization for the seizure from the Registrar of Vehicles or authorized representative. In all those cases, a notice of the lien and the intent to sell the vehicle shall be given by the department to the legal and registered owner, and to any other person known to be claiming an interest in the vehicle, within 48 hours after seizure
 excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays specified in Section 6700 of the Government Code. Any hearing to contest the lien and the seizure shall be requested within 10 days following transmittal of that notice.

(g) When a lien exists against one or more vehicles owned by the same person or persons, the department may seize and sell a sufficient number of the vehicles to pay the lien, plus costs, on one or more of the vehicles in accordance with subdivision (a).

(h) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall assist with the seizure and impounding of the vehicle. Any municipality or county law enforcement agency may assist with the seizure and impounding of the vehicle.

(i) Any property found by the department in any vehicle seized under the provisions of this article shall be handled by the department in
 the same manner as is provided in Sections 2414 and 2415.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1211, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

9802.

(a) The Registrar of Vehicles or authorized representative shall conduct the sale in the same manner as provided by law for the seizure and sale of personal property by the assessor for the collection of taxes due on personal property.

(b) The department may bid for the vehicle an amount equal to the lien held by the department for registration, transfer, and license fees, use taxes, parking penalties, and any interest, penalties, and costs added thereto. In all cases where
 the vehicle becomes the property of the department, it shall be reduced to junk and sold.
